Washington statutes.
RCW 35.74.070

License fees—Renewal of license.

The owner or keeper of any toll bridges in any city or town shall, before the renewal of any license, report to the city or town council under oath, the actual cost of construction and equipment of the toll bridge, the repairs and cost of maintaining it during the preceding year, the amount of tax collected, and the estimated cash value of the bridge, exclusive of the franchise. All funds arising from the license tax shall be paid into the general fund of the city or town.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.74.070. Prior: 1890 p 55 s 4; RRS s 9326.]